Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3038.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $215,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $215,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Minnesota Historical Society for grants to the Minnesota Agricultural Interpretive Center - Farmamerica. new text end